Utah statutes.
4-30-7.   Transfer of livestock market license permitted -- Conditions.

(1)  No livestock market license is transferable to another person without the prior approval of the commissioner.

(2)  A change in the membership of a partnership or association, or the sale or transfer of a 25% or greater interest in the stock ownership of a corporate livestock market shall be considered a transfer of the livestock market license and is subject to the requirements of this section.

(3)  Application to allow transfer of a livestock market license shall be made to the department on a form prescribed and furnished by it.

(4)  The commissioner may grant a transfer of the license:

(a)  if the proposed transferee meets all the requirements specified for an original license in Section 4-30-4; and

(b)  based on the criteria specified in Section 4-30-6.

